Rhode Island, session 2025, SB44.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-5 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local
Taxes" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-5-89. South Kingstown homestead exemption.
(a) The town council of the town of South Kingstown is authorized to annually fix the
amount, if any, of a homestead exemption, with respect to assessed value, from local taxation on
taxable real property used for residential purposes or mixed purposes, defined as a combination of
residential and commercial uses, in the town of South Kingstown, and to grant homestead
exemptions to the owner, or owners, of residential real estate, or combination residential and
commercial real estate, in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the assessed value. The
exemption shall apply to property used exclusively for residential purposes, and improved with a
dwelling containing less than five (5) units, or real property used for a combination of residential
and commercial uses. When real property is used for mixed purposes, the percentage of the assessed
value shall be a prorated amount. The prorated amount shall be the percentage of square feet of the
parcel used for residential purposes, multiplied by the percentage of the homestead exemption. In
order to determine compliance with the homestead exemption as outlined in this section, the town
council shall provide, by resolution or ordinance, rules and regulations governing eligibility for the
exemption established by this section.
(b) In the event property granted an exemption under this section is sold or transferred
during the year for which the exemption is claimed, the town council of the town of South

Kingstown, upon approval of the town council, may provide for a proration of the homestead
exemption in cases where title to property passes from those not entitled to claim an exemption to
those who are entitled to claim an exemption.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on December 31, 2025.
========
LC000162
========
LC000162 - Page 2 of 3